Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6000.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 42b. Every local tax collecting unit is encouraged to provide members of the public, including, but not limited to, prospective home buyers, free and readily accessible online information related to the following: (a) Information reasonably predictive of the expected property tax liability that would be incurred as a result of a transfer of ownership subject to section 27a(3) of any given parcel of real property in the local tax collecting unit to an individual who would own and use the property as a principal residence exempt from the tax levied by a local school district for school operating purposes under section 7cc. (b) Contact information for the assessor's office of the local tax collecting unit, including a telephone number. (c) Information on how a taxpayer may appeal an assessment of the taxpayer's property, including a current timeline of the appeals process. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 180 days after the date it is enacted into law.